South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4281.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-19-480(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) If a salvage, salvage flood, or salvage fire vehicle is rebuilt, a regular certificate of title may not again be issued except upon submission of an application stating that the vehicle has been rebuilt and containing the information ordinarily required by the department for the issuance of a certificate of title as well as any information the department may require about the identity of the vehicle, the source and cost of any parts used in, and the extent of any repairs or other work done to the vehicle, and that the rebuilt vehicle is equipped with safety features that include, but are not limited to, air bags, three-point restraint systems, and gas tank fuel-spill prevention devices that have been installed and are operational.  The owner shall follow the procedure prescribed by the department if he is seeking a rebuilt brand on a title. Any regular certificate of title issued by the department for a previously salvaged vehicle must be annotated to show that the vehicle was "salvaged rebuilt" and the reason why the vehicle was "salvage rebuilt," "salvage flood rebuilt," or "salvage fire rebuilt." SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----